Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 24
UNIFORM COMMON TRUST FUND ACT

Cross references:

For fiduciary powers of banks, see article 106 of this title 11.

Section

11-24-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Common Trust Fund Act".

Source:

L. 47:

p. 894, § 5.

CSA:

C. 18, § 177.

CRS 53:

§ 14-10-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 14-18-5.

11-24-102. Common trust funds established and operated.

Any bank or trust company qualified to act as fiduciary in this state may establish and operate, alone or jointly with another bank or trust company qualified to act as fiduciary in this state, common trust funds for the purpose of furnishing investments to itself as fiduciary, to itself and others as cofiduciaries, to other banks or trust companies as fiduciaries, or to other banks or trust companies and others as cofiduciaries. Such fiduciary or cofiduciary may invest funds which it lawfully holds for investment in interests in such common trust funds, if such investment is not prohibited by the instrument, judgment, decree, or order creating such fiduciary relationship, and if, in the case of cofiduciaries, the bank or trust company procures the consent of its cofiduciaries to such investment. Any person acting as cofiduciary with any such bank or trust company is hereby authorized to consent to the investment in such interests. In determining whether the investment of funds received or held by a bank or trust company as fiduciary in a common trust fund is proper, the bank or trust company may consider the common fund as a whole and shall not be prohibited from making such investment because of any particular asset.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 893, § 1.

CSA:

C. 18, § 173.

CRS 53:

§ 14-10-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 14-18-1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 563, § 1, effective June 9.

11-24-103. Exclusive management and control.

Any bank or trust company maintaining one or more common trust funds shall have the exclusive management and control of each common trust fund administered by it and the sole right at any time to sell, convert, exchange, transfer, or otherwise change or dispose of the assets comprising same. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, such bank or trust company may deposit investments of a common trust fund, which investments are securities, with a clearing corporation or with a federal reserve bank pursuant to part 5 of article 1 of title 15, C.R.S., for the account of the bank or trust company and such investments shall be deemed for the purposes of this article to be in the custody of such bank or trust company.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 893, § 4.

CSA:

C. 18, § 176.

CRS 53:

§ 14-10-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 14-18-3.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 563, § 2, effective June 9.

11-24-104. Court accountings.

Unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction, the bank or trust company operating such common trust funds is not required to render a court accounting with regard to such funds; but, by application to the district court, it may secure approval of such an accounting on such conditions as the court may establish.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 893, § 2.

CSA:

C. 18, § 174.

CRS 53:

§ 14-10-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 14-18-2.

11-24-105. Uniformity of interpretation.

This article shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 893, § 3.

CSA:

C. 18, § 175.

CRS 53:

§ 14-10-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 14-18-4.

11-24-106. Existing fiduciary relationships.

This article became effective January 1, 1948, and applies to fiduciary relationships then in existence or thereafter established.

Source:

L. 47:

p. 894, § 8.

CSA:

C. 18, § 178.

CRS 53:

§ 14-10-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 14-18-6.

11-24-107. Fiduciary defined.

The word "fiduciary", whenever used in this article, means a bank or trust company undertaking to act alone or jointly with others primarily for the benefit of another or others in all matters connected with its undertaking and includes personal representatives [including executors, administrators, administrators with the will annexed (cum testamento annexo), administrators in succession acting under a will (de bonis non), ancillary administrators acting under a will, and ancillary executors], special administrators, guardians, conservators, trustees, whether of express or implied trusts, custodians under the "Colorado Uniform Transfers to Minors Act" (notwithstanding anything in said act which may be interpreted as contrary to this grant of authority), assignees, receivers, managing agents, as defined in this section, and any other person acting in a similar capacity. "Managing agent" means a fiduciary acting in the fiduciary relationship assumed upon the creation of a relationship which confers investment discretion on the fiduciary, but as to which the technical legal relationship is that of agent and principal.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 564, § 3, effective June 9.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 393, § 3, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Uniform Transfers to Minors Act", see article 50 of this title 11.